North Dakota statutes. TITLE 28 Judicial Procedure, Civil
CHAPTER 28-09 Judgment Without Trial [Repealed]

[Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure]

28-09-01.
Judgment — Definition. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 54.

28-09-02.
Judgment on default. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 55.

28-09-03.
Default judgment on written instrument. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 55.

28-09-04.
Default judgment — Proof to be required. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 55.

28-09-05.
Default judgment — When notice required. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 55.

28-09-06.
Default judgment — Security may be required. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 55.

28-09-07.
When counterclaim less than plaintiff’s claim. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 13.

28-09-08.
Divorce cases — Evidence to be filed. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

28-09-09.
Judgment on counterclaim. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 55.

28-09-10.
Frivolous pleading. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 12.

28-09-11.
Summary judgment. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 56.

28-09-12.
Effect of offer on costs upon offer of judgment. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 68.